Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-1427
Independent committee, defined.

Independent committee shall mean a committee other than a candidate, ballot question, or political party committee.

Laws 1976, LB 987, § 27;

Laws 1980, LB 535, § 4.